Arkansas, session 2025, HB1440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-86-102 is amended to read as follows:
17-86-102. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Entity” means a corporation, association, limited liability
company, general partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship or
other organization recognized under the laws of the State of Arkansas or any
other state;
(2) “Licensee” means an individual licensed under this chapter;
(2)(A)(3)(A) “Massage therapist” means a person who has:
(i) Earned a diploma from a State Board of Health
accepted school of massage therapy;
(ii) Passed an examination required or accepted by
the State Board of Health; and
(iii) Become licensed and registered to practice
massage therapy.
(B) “Massage therapist” includes a person who has
*JMB297*
02-24-2025 10:33:32 JMB297

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1440
previously obtained the massage therapist license under prior state law.
(C) A massage therapist may:
(i) Instruct continuing education programs approved
by the Department of Health; and
(ii) Assist in the instruction of the procedures
defined in subdivisions (3)(A)-(C) (4)(A)-(C) of this section under the
direct supervision of a massage therapy instructor or master massage
therapist;
(3)(A)(4)(A) “Massage therapy” means the treatment of soft
tissues, which may include skin, fascia, and muscles and their dysfunctions
for therapeutic purposes of establishing and maintaining good physical
condition, comfort, and relief of pain.
(B) “Massage therapy” is a healthcare service that
includes gliding, kneading, percussion, compression, vibration, friction,
nerve strokes, and stretching the tissue.
(C) “Massage therapy” also means to engage in the practice
of any of the following procedures:
(i) Massage therapy techniques and procedures,
either hands-on or with mechanical devices;
(ii) Therapeutic application and use of oils, herbal
or chemical preparations, lubricants, nonprescription creams, lotions,
scrubs, powders, and other spa services;
(iii) Therapeutic application of hot or cold packs;
(iv) Hydrotherapy techniques;
(v) Heliotherapy, which may include mechanical
devices, heat lamps, and other devices;
(vi) Electrotherapy;
(vii) Any hands-on bodywork techniques and procedures
rising to the level of the techniques and procedures intended to be regulated
under this chapter and not covered under specific licensing laws of other
boards; and
(viii) Cupping therapy;
(4)(5) “Massage therapy apprentice” means a person who is
enrolled in a massage therapy apprenticeship program;
(5)(6) “Massage therapy apprenticeship program” means a program
that meets the federal guidelines set out in 29 C.F.R. Part 29, as existing
02-24-2025 10:33:32 JMB297

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1440
on March 1, 2021, and is approved by the United States Office of
Apprenticeship;
(7) "Massage therapy establishment” means a location other than
a massage therapy school in which massage therapy is performed including
without limitation:
(A) A massage therapy clinic;
(B) A massage therapy spa; or
(C) An entity that contracts with or employs a massage
therapist to provide massage therapy services at an alternate location,
including without limitation a private residence, hotel, or other permanent
or temporary dwelling;
(8) “Massage therapy establishment registration” means the
mandatory registration with the department that permits the operation of a
massage therapy establishment;
(6)(9) “Massage therapy clinic” means a clinic, place, premises,
building, or part of a building in which a branch or any combination of
branches of massage therapy or the occupation of a massage therapist is
practiced;
(7)(A)(10)(A) “Massage therapy instructor” means a person who:
(i) Before July 1, 2010, has completed no less than
two hundred fifty (250) hours of practical experience as a master massage
therapist, which may be gained, in part or in whole, as an assistant to an
instructor in a massage school or may be gained, in part or in whole, as a
directed instructor in a massage school and has completed no less than two
hundred fifty (250) continuing education hours as approved by the department;
(ii) On or after July 1, 2010, has been an active and
practicing licensee and registered as a master massage therapist for a period
of not less than three (3) years preceding the application for an upgrade to
massage therapy instructor;
(iii) On or after July 1, 2010, in addition to the
experience under subdivision (7)(A)(i) (10)(A)(i) of this section, has
completed no less than two hundred fifty (250) continuing education hours as
approved by the department as a licensed master massage therapist; and
(iv) Is determined by the department to be qualified
to be licensed and registered to practice massage therapy.
(B) “Massage therapy instructor” includes a person who has
02-24-2025 10:33:32 JMB297

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1440
previously obtained the massage therapy instructor license under prior state
law.
(C) Massage therapy instructors may:
(i) Instruct continuing education programs approved
by the department;
(ii) Instruct any of the procedures in subdivision
(3) (4) of this section; and
(iii) Instruct basic curricula in a massage therapy
school registered by the department as required by § 17-86-306(e);
(8)(11) “Massage therapy learning permit” means a permit issued
by the Department of Health department before enrollment in a massage therapy
apprenticeship program or in a massage therapy school that is valid for no
longer than six (6) months after completion of the apprenticeship or
graduation from the massage therapy school;
(9)(12) “Massage therapy school” means a registered and licensed
facility that meets and follows the required educational standards as
established by § 17-86-306 and all pertinent rules established by the State
Board of Health;
(10)(13) “Massage therapy spa” means a site or premises, or
portion of a site or premises, in which a massage therapist practices
massage;
(11)(14) “Massage therapy student” means a person who is
enrolled in a licensed massage therapy school or postsecondary massage
therapy school;
(12)(A)(15)(A) “Master massage therapist” means a person who:
(i) Before July 1, 2010, is a licensed and
registered massage therapist who has completed no fewer than two hundred
fifty (250) hours of practical experience as a massage therapist, which may
be gained in part or in whole as an assistant to an instructor in a massage
school and has completed no less than one hundred twenty-five (125)
continuing education hours as approved by the department;
(ii) Either:
(a) On or after July 1, 2010, has:
(1) Been an active and practicing
licensee and registered as a massage therapist for a period of not less than
two (2) years preceding the application for an upgrade to master massage
02-24-2025 10:33:32 JMB297

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1440
therapist; and
(2) In addition to the experience under
subdivision (12)(A)(i) (15)(A)(i) of this section, completed no less than one
hundred twenty-five (125) continuing education hours as approved by the
department; or
(b) On or after July 1, 2023, has:
(1) Been an active practicing licensee
and registered as a massage therapist for the period of not less than twelve
(12) months preceding the application for an upgrade to master massage
therapist; and
(2) Completed not less than three
hundred (300) hours of advanced coursework in massage therapy as part of an
Associate of Applied Science degree of massage therapy from an accredited
college or university; and
(iii) Is determined by the department to be qualified
to be licensed and registered to practice massage therapy.
(B) “Master massage therapist” includes a person who has
previously obtained the master massage therapist license under a prior state
law.
(C) Master massage therapists may:
(i) Instruct continuing education programs approved
by the department;
(ii) Instruct any of the procedures in subdivision
(3) (4) of this section; and
(iii) Instruct, as directed by a massage therapy
instructor, basic curricula in a massage therapy school registered by the
department as required by § 17-86-306(e);
(13)(16) “Postsecondary massage therapy school” means a massage
therapy school that:
(A) Offers a postsecondary curriculum approved by the
State Board of Health; and
(B) Has an enrollment in which no more than fifty percent
(50%) of its students do not have a high school diploma or the recognized
equivalent of a high school diploma;
(17) “Principal” means each owner, member, shareholder, partner,
or other person with a financial interest in an entity applying for or
02-24-2025 10:33:32 JMB297

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1440
holding a massage therapy establishment registration; and
(14)(18) “Sexual misconduct” includes:
(A) A range of behavior used to obtain sexual
gratification against another's will, at the expense of another, without the
client's knowledge, engaging in sexual activity for profit, or a combination
of any of these activities;
(B) Massage of the genitalia, anus, and, except under
specific circumstances, the breast; and
(C) Sexual activity with consent of a client or at the
request of a client; and
(15) “This chapter” means the Massage Therapy Act, § 17-86-101
et seq.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-86-104 is amended to read as follows:
17-86-104. Criminal background checks.
An applicant applying for enrollment in a massage therapy school,
postsecondary massage therapy school, or massage therapy apprenticeship
program or applying as a new massage therapy licensee, an individual applying
for a new massage therapy school license, a person applying individually or
as principal of an entity applying for a massage therapy establishment
registration, or a licensee applying for an upgrade issued by the Department
of Health shall apply to the Identification Bureau of the Division of
Arkansas State Police for a state and federal criminal background check to be
conducted by the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State
Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-86-203(b)(1) and (2), concerning the
powers and duties of the State Board of Health and the Department of Health
relating to the licensure of massage therapists, are amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1)(A) The Department of Health shall inspect or cause an
inspection of student records at least one (1) time each year for each
massage therapy school operated in this state.
(B) The department and its agents and employees may enter
and inspect a massage therapy clinic, spa, or school establishment or massage
therapy school during operating hours of the business.
02-24-2025 10:33:32 JMB297

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1440
(2) The department and its agents and employees shall not
request or be granted permission to enter a room of a massage therapy clinic,
spa, or school establishment or massage therapy school in which a client is
receiving treatment from a licensee under this chapter.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 17-86-203(e), concerning the powers and
duties of the State Board of Health and the Department of Health relating to
the licensure of massage therapists, is amended to read as follows:
(e) For purposes of this section, the board shall follow the licensing
and registration restrictions based on criminal records under § 17-3-102.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 17-86-204(a) and (b), concerning records
relating to the licensure of massage therapists, are amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) The Department of Health shall maintain a record book and
computer file in which will be entered the names and addresses of all persons
and entities to whom licenses or registrations have been granted under this
chapter, the license or registration number, and the dates of granting such
licenses, registrations, and renewals thereof, and other matters of record.
(2) The department will move to a separate book and file the
records of all persons who have died, have let their licenses lapse for three
(3) years, whose licenses have been suspended or revoked by the department,
or cancelled by the licensee.
(b)(1) The record books and computer files so provided and maintained
shall be deemed and considered a book of records and files of records, and
they will be kept in a timely manner.
(2) A transcript of any record therein or a license or
registration number or date of granting such a license or registration to a
person charged with a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter
shall be admitted as evidence in any of the courts of this state if certified
by the department.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 17-86-301(a)(1)-(5), concerning
registration and licensures required under the Massage Therapy Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(1) For any person who does not hold a valid massage therapy
02-24-2025 10:33:32 JMB297

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1440
license to use the following titles: massage therapist, massage practitioner,
myotherapist, massotherapist, massage technologist, masseur, masseuse,
therapy technologist, master massage therapist, massage therapy instructor,
or any derivation of those titles or to advertise such titles;
(2) For any person who does not hold the applicable massage
therapy license issued by the Department of Health to engage professionally
for payment, barter, donation, or exchange in the practice or instruction of
massage therapy as defined in this chapter;
(3) For any person to operate or conduct any massage therapy
clinic establishment or massage therapy school which does not conform to the
sanitary rules contained in § 17-86-302, in state law, in local ordinances,
or in those rules which may be adopted by the State Board of Health;
(4) To employ any person to practice in a massage therapy
establishment or instruct under this chapter who does not hold a valid
license issued by the department;
(5) For any person to operate a massage therapy school or clinic
massage therapy establishment without its first being registered under the
provisions of this chapter as a licensed massage therapy school or registered
clinic registered as a massage therapy establishment;

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 17-86-301(c)(1) and (2), concerning
registration and licensures required under the Massage Therapy Act, are
amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) A licensee or registration holder shall notify the department
in writing of any change of name, address, phone number, or place of
employment.
(2) If a name change is requested, a new license or registration
shall be issued in the new name at the next renewal date or immediately for a
fee not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) for printing of a new license.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 17-86-302(a), concerning sanitary
requirements for massage therapy schools and massage therapy establishments,
is amended to read as follows:
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person or school to be licensed or
any clinic establishment to be operated under the provisions of this chapter
unless the following requirements are met and practiced:
02-24-2025 10:33:32 JMB297

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1440
(1) A sink for hand washing with hot and cold running water and
soap must be accessible;
(2) A restroom must be accessible;
(3) A towel or sheet that has been used by one (1) client may
not be used on another person unless the towel or sheet has been relaundered;
(4) Anyone who has any infectious, contagious, or communicable
disease which may be spread by airborne, droplet, contact, or indirect
methods and who is in contact with the public must not practice until all
risk of disease transmission is cleared. Any employee with such a disease
must be immediately relieved from duty until all risk of disease transmission
is cleared;
(5) A school or clinic must be equipped with a massage table or
tables or a massage chair or chairs or equipped with such standard equipment
dictated by the practice engaged in as defined in § 17-86-102; and
(6) A clinic or school must comply with all requirements of the
Department of Health, city ordinances, and state laws.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 17-86-307 is amended to read as follows:
17-86-307. Massage therapy clinic and spa establishment.
(a)(1) A person or entity shall not establish, maintain, or operate a
massage therapy clinic or massage therapy spa, or both, until the address and
telephone number of the office, clinic, or spa have been supplied in writing
to the Department of Health establishment unless the person or entity is
registered with the Department of Health.
(2) To open a massage therapy establishment, each principal of a
massage therapy establishment shall submit to the department the following:
(A) A completed registration application as furnished by
the department;
(B)(i) List of all principals, and each principal’s
massage therapy license number, if applicable;
(ii) If requested by the department, the applicant
or massage therapy establishment registration holder shall provide any
requested documentation to support each principal’s interest in the entity;
(C) List of all licensed massage therapists performing
services in the massage therapy establishment;
(D) A certificate of good standing from the Secretary of
02-24-2025 10:33:32 JMB297

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1440
State, if applicable; and
(E) A copy of a business license from city or
municipality, if applicable.
(3) Each massage therapy establishment registration issued under
this chapter shall be valid for two (2) years from the date of issuance.
(4) Any massage therapy establishment registered and in good
standing with the department on the effective date of this section shall have
ninety (90) days to submit all required documentation to the department as
provided in this section.
(5) The massage therapy establishment registration is not
transferable.
(b) If a massage therapy clinic, massage therapy spa, or both moves to
a new location or changes its phone number, the new address or phone number,
or both, shall be submitted immediately to the department in writing before
operating the clinic or spa, or both, at the new address If any information
or documentation provided by the massage therapy establishment under
subsection (a) of this section changes after initial registration, the
massage therapy establishment shall update the department within ten (10)
business days of the change.
(c) The annual inspection fee for each clinic and spa shall not exceed
seventy-five dollars ($75.00).

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code §§ 17-86-310 and 17-86-311 are amended to
read as follows:
17-86-310. Display of license or registration.
(a)(1) An official massage therapy license shall be conspicuously and
publicly displayed in the place where the holder engages in the practice of
massage therapy or instruction of massage therapy.
(2) A An official massage therapy school license shall be
conspicuously displayed in the massage therapy school.
(3) An official massage therapy establishment registration shall
be conspicuously displayed in the massage therapy establishment.
(b) It is unlawful to tamper with or reduce in size an original
massage therapy license or registration issued by the Department of Health.
(c) Each license or registration shall provide the correct address of
the department.
02-24-2025 10:33:32 JMB297

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1440

17-86-311. Disciplinary actions and penalties.
(a) The Massage Therapy Technical Advisory Committee may deny,
suspend, place on probation, or revoke a license or registration upon any one
(1) of the following grounds:
(1) A felony listed under § 17-3-102 or the offense of
prostitution, either in this state or another state;
(2) Malpractice or gross incompetency;
(3) The use in advertisements of untruthful or improbable
statements or flamboyant, exaggerated, or extravagant claims concerning the
licensee's professional excellence or abilities;
(4) Habitual drunkenness or habitual use of any illegal drugs;
(5) Serving alcoholic beverages at the clinic or school in a
room where massage therapy is being performed or in a massage therapy school;
(6) Unprofessional conduct;
(7) Failure to comply with the Department of Health's Massage
Therapy Code of Ethics or any valid rule or order of the department;
(8) Invasion of the field of practice of any profession for
which a license is required, the diagnosis of ailments, diseases, or injuries
of human beings, the performance of osseous adjustments, prescription of
medications, or other breaches of the scope of practice of massage therapy;
(9) Failure of any licensee or registration holder to comply
with this chapter; or
(10) Failure to have licensed personnel to perform massage
therapy techniques in his or her clinic establishment or school;
(11) Employing, contracting, or allowing an individual who does
not hold a current massage therapy license or massage therapy learning permit
to perform massage therapy techniques in the licensee's massage therapy
establishment or massage therapy school; or
(12) Operating an establishment without a massage therapy
establishment registration.
(b)(1) The State Board of Health shall establish by rule the penalty
system to be imposed under this section.
(2) Whenever the committee finds that the holder of a license,
certificate of registration, or other permit issued by the department is
guilty of a violation of the rules of the department or the laws of the state
02-24-2025 10:33:32 JMB297

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1440
pertaining to any occupation, profession, or business licensed or regulated
by the department, the committee may impose a penalty on the licensee,
registration holder, or permit holder in lieu of suspension or revocation of
license, certificate of registration, or other permit.
(3)(A) Upon imposition of a penalty in lieu of suspension or
revocation of license, certificate of registration, or other permit, the
committee may require that the licensee or permit holder pay a penalty to the
department.
(B) The license, certificate of registration, or permit
shall be suspended until the penalty is paid.
(4)(A) The penalty may be imposed in lieu of revocation or
suspension of a license, certificate of registration, or other permit only if
the committee formally finds that the public health, safety, welfare, and
morals would not be impaired and that the payment of the penalty will achieve
the desired disciplinary results.
(B) The minimum penalty imposed by the committee in lieu
of revocation or suspension of a license, certificate, or other permit shall
be twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and the maximum penalty one thousand dollars
($1,000) per infraction.
(C) The authority of the committee to impose penalties
under this section is not affected by any other civil or criminal proceeding
concerning the same violation.
(D) A person penalized by the committee under this chapter
may appeal any order of the committee in the manner currently provided by
law.
(E) In addition to any other sanctions authorized by this
chapter, the committee may impose a civil penalty as provided in this
subsection against any unlicensed person, firm, or corporation practicing or
offering to practice any actions requiring licensure under this chapter.
(c)(1) The massage therapist-patient relationship is founded on mutual
trust. Sexual misconduct is prohibited.
(2) The committee shall revoke the license of a person who
engages in the practice of massage of the breasts unless the massage
therapist:
(A) Engages in the practice of massage of the breasts for
therapeutic and medical purposes including without limitation the reduction
02-24-2025 10:33:32 JMB297

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1440
of scar tissue following a surgery on the breast, release of myofascial
binding, or improving lymphatic flow; and
(B) Has received at least forty-eight (48) hours of
continuing education credits in lymphatic massage, myofascial massage, or
oncology massage.
(3) A suspension revocation of a license or registration under
subdivisions (c)(1) and (2) of this section shall be for a period of at least
three (3) years and any application for reinstatement of a license shall be
reviewed for approval by the Massage Therapy Technical Advisory Committee.
(d)(1) Charges may be brought by any person.
(2) Any accusation of any of the offenses enumerated in this
section may be filed with the committee. The accusations shall be in writing,
signed by the accuser, and verified under oath.
(e) In denying, suspending, or revoking any license or registration,
the committee shall afford any party review as provided for in the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., and as otherwise provided
by the rules of the State Board of Health.

/s/Bentley

















02-24-2025 10:33:32 JMB297